Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska35-1206
Distributions from fund; amount; disqualification; when.

(1)(a) Rural and suburban fire protection districts or mutual finance organizations which qualify for assistance under section 35-1205 shall receive ten dollars times the assumed population of the fire protection district or mutual finance organization as calculated in subsection (3) of such section plus the population of any city of the first class that is part of the district or mutual finance organization, not to exceed three hundred thousand dollars for any one district or mutual finance organization;

(b) Each village or city of the second class that is a member of a mutual finance organization which qualifies for assistance under section 35-1205 shall receive ten thousand dollars; and

(c) Each rural or suburban fire protection district which qualifies for assistance under section 35-1205 shall receive ten thousand dollars, regardless of whether such district is a member in a mutual finance organization which qualifies for assistance under section 35-1205.

(2) If the district or mutual finance organization is located in more than one county and meets the threshold for qualification in subsection (1) or (2) of section 35-1205 in one of such counties, the district or mutual finance organization shall receive assistance under this section for all of its assumed population, including that which is assumed population in counties for which the threshold is not reached by the district or mutual finance organization.

(3) If a mutual finance organization qualifies for assistance under this section and one or more rural or suburban fire protection districts or cities or villages fail to levy a tax rate that complies with subsection (1) of section 35-1204, as required under the mutual finance organization agreement, the mutual finance organization shall be disqualified for assistance in the following year and each subsequent year until the year following any year for which all districts and cities and villages in the mutual finance organization levy a tax rate that complies with subsection (1) of section 35-1204, as required by a mutual finance organization agreement.

Laws 1998, LB 1120, § 6;

Laws 1999, LB 141, § 8;

Laws 2019, LB63, § 4;

Laws 2021, LB664, § 1.
The Revisor of Statutes, as authorized by section 49-705(1)(g), has corrected a manifest clerical error in Laws 2021, LB664, section 1, by changing two references to section 32-1205 which should have been section 35-1205 in subdivision (1)(c) of section 35-1206.